Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 8 Medical Assistance
40-8-13.4.
Rate methodology for payment for in-state and out-of-state hospital services.

The executive office of health and human services (“executive office”) shall implement a new methodology for payment for in-state and out-of-state hospital services in order to ensure access to, and the provision of, high-quality and cost-effective hospital care to its eligible recipients.

In order to improve efficiency and cost-effectiveness, the executive office shall:

With respect to inpatient services for persons in fee-for-service Medicaid, which is non-managed care, implement a new payment methodology for inpatient services utilizing the Diagnosis Related Groups (DRG) method of payment, which is, a patient-classification method that provides a means of relating payment to the hospitals to the type of patients cared for by the hospitals. It is understood that a payment method based on DRG may include cost outlier payments and other specific exceptions. The executive office will review the DRG-payment method and the DRG base price annually, making adjustments as appropriate in consideration of such elements as trends in hospital input costs; patterns in hospital coding; beneficiary access to care; and the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services national CMS Prospective Payment System (IPPS) Hospital Input Price Index. For the twelve-month (12) period beginning July 1, 2015, the DRG base rate for Medicaid fee-for-service inpatient hospital services shall not exceed ninety-seven and one-half percent (97.5%) of the payment rates in effect as of July 1, 2014. Beginning July 1, 2019, the DRG base rate for Medicaid fee-for-service inpatient hospital services shall be 107.2% of the payment rates in effect as of July 1, 2018. Increases in the Medicaid fee-for-service DRG hospital payments for the twelve-month (12) period beginning July 1, 2020, shall be based on the payment rates in effect as of July 1 of the preceding fiscal year, and shall be the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services national Prospective Payment System (IPPS) Hospital Input Price Index. Beginning July 1, 2022, the DRG base rate for Medicaid fee-for-service inpatient hospital services shall be one hundred five percent (105%) of the payment rates in effect as of July 1, 2021. Increases in the Medicaid fee-for-service DRG hospital payments for each annual twelve-month (12) period beginning July 1, 2023, shall be based on the payment rates in effect as of July 1 of the preceding fiscal year, and shall be the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services national Prospective Payment System (IPPS) Hospital Input Price Index.

With respect to inpatient services, (A) It is required as of January 1, 2011, until December 31, 2011, that the Medicaid managed care payment rates between each hospital and health plan shall not exceed ninety and one-tenth percent (90.1%) of the rate in effect as of June 30, 2010. Increases in inpatient hospital payments for each annual twelve-month (12) period beginning January 1, 2012, may not exceed the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services national CMS Prospective Payment System (IPPS) Hospital Input Price Index for the applicable period; (B) Provided, however, for the twenty-four-month (24) period beginning July 1, 2013, the Medicaid managed care payment rates between each hospital and health plan shall not exceed the payment rates in effect as of January 1, 2013, and for the twelve-month (12) period beginning July 1, 2015, the Medicaid managed care payment inpatient rates between each hospital and health plan shall not exceed ninety-seven and one-half percent (97.5%) of the payment rates in effect as of January 1, 2013; (C) Increases in inpatient hospital payments for each annual twelve-month (12) period beginning July 1, 2017, shall be the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services national CMS Prospective Payment System (IPPS) Hospital Input Price Index, less Productivity Adjustment, for the applicable period and shall be paid to each hospital retroactively to July 1; (D) Beginning July 1, 2019, the Medicaid managed care payment inpatient rates between each hospital and health plan shall be 107.2% of the payment rates in effect as of January 1, 2019, and shall be paid to each hospital retroactively to July 1; (E) Increases in inpatient hospital payments for each annual twelve-month (12) period beginning July 1, 2020, shall be based on the payment rates in effect as of January 1 of the preceding fiscal year, and shall be the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services national CMS Prospective Payment System (IPPS) Hospital Input Price Index, less Productivity Adjustment, for the applicable period and shall be paid to each hospital retroactively to July 1; the executive office will develop an audit methodology and process to assure that savings associated with the payment reductions will accrue directly to the Rhode Island Medicaid program through reduced managed care plan payments and shall not be retained by the managed care plans; (F) Beginning July 1, 2022, the Medicaid managed care payment inpatient rates between each hospital and health plan shall be one hundred five percent (105%) of the payment rates in effect as of January 1, 2022, and shall be paid to each hospital retroactively to July 1 within ninety days of passage; (G) Increases in inpatient hospital payments for each annual twelve-month (12) period beginning July 1, 2023, shall be based on the payment rates in effect as of January 1 of the preceding fiscal year, and shall be the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services national CMS Prospective Payment System (IPPS) Hospital Input Price Index, less Productivity Adjustment, for the applicable period and shall be paid to each hospital retroactively to July 1 within ninety days of passage; (H) All hospitals licensed in Rhode Island shall accept such payment rates as payment in full; and (I) For all such hospitals, compliance with the provisions of this section shall be a condition of participation in the Rhode Island Medicaid program.

With respect to outpatient services and notwithstanding any provisions of the law to the contrary, for persons enrolled in fee-for-service Medicaid, the executive office will reimburse hospitals for outpatient services using a rate methodology determined by the executive office and in accordance with federal regulations. Fee-for-service outpatient rates shall align with Medicare payments for similar services. Notwithstanding the above, there shall be no increase in the Medicaid fee-for-service outpatient rates effective on July 1, 2013, July 1, 2014, or July 1, 2015. For the twelve-month (12) period beginning July 1, 2015, Medicaid fee-for-service outpatient rates shall not exceed ninety-seven and one-half percent (97.5%) of the rates in effect as of July 1, 2014. Increases in the outpatient hospital payments for the twelve-month (12) period beginning July 1, 2016, may not exceed the CMS national Outpatient Prospective Payment System (OPPS) Hospital Input Price Index. Beginning July 1, 2019, the Medicaid fee-for-service outpatient rates shall be 107.2% of the payment rates in effect as of July 1, 2018. Increases in the outpatient hospital payments for the twelve-month (12) period beginning July 1, 2020, shall be based on the payment rates in effect as of July 1 of the preceding fiscal year, and shall be the CMS national Outpatient Prospective Payment System (OPPS) Hospital Input Price Index. Beginning July 1, 2022, the Medicaid fee-for-service outpatient rates shall be one hundred five percent (105%) of the payment rates in effect as of July 1, 2021. Increases in the outpatient hospital payments for each annual twelve-month (12) period beginning July 1, 2023, shall be based on the payment rates in effect as of July 1 of the preceding fiscal year, and shall be the CMS national Outpatient Prospective Payment System (OPPS) Hospital Input Price Index. With respect to the outpatient rate, (i) It is required as of January 1, 2011, until December 31, 2011, that the Medicaid managed care payment rates between each hospital and health plan shall not exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the rate in effect as of June 30, 2010; (ii) Increases in hospital outpatient payments for each annual twelve-month (12) period beginning January 1, 2012, until July 1, 2017, may not exceed the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services national CMS Outpatient Prospective Payment System OPPS Hospital Price Index for the applicable period; (iii) Provided, however, for the twenty-four-month (24) period beginning July 1, 2013, the Medicaid managed care outpatient payment rates between each hospital and health plan shall not exceed the payment rates in effect as of January 1, 2013, and for the twelve-month (12) period beginning July 1, 2015, the Medicaid managed care outpatient payment rates between each hospital and health plan shall not exceed ninety-seven and one-half percent (97.5%) of the payment rates in effect as of January 1, 2013; (iv) Increases in outpatient hospital payments for each annual twelve-month (12) period beginning July 1, 2017, shall be the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services national CMS OPPS Hospital Input Price Index, less Productivity Adjustment, for the applicable period and shall be paid to each hospital retroactively to July 1; (v) Beginning July 1, 2019, the Medicaid managed care outpatient payment rates between each hospital and health plan shall be one hundred seven and two-tenths percent (107.2%) of the payment rates in effect as of January 1, 2019, and shall be paid to each hospital retroactively to July 1; (vi) Increases in outpatient hospital payments for each annual twelve-month (12) period beginning July 1, 2020, shall be based on the payment rates in effect as of January 1 of the preceding fiscal year, and shall be the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services national CMS OPPS Hospital Input Price Index, less Productivity Adjustment, for the applicable period and shall be paid to each hospital retroactively to July 1; (vii) Beginning July 1, 2022, the Medicaid managed care outpatient payment rates between each hospital and health plan shall be one hundred five percent (105%) of the payment rates in effect as of January 1, 2022, and shall be paid to each hospital retroactively to July 1 within ninety days of passage; (viii) Increases in outpatient hospital payments for each annual twelve-month (12) period beginning July 1, 2020, shall be based on the payment rates in effect as of January 1 of the preceding fiscal year, and shall be the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services national CMS OPPS Hospital Input Price Index, less Productivity Adjustment, for the applicable period and shall be paid to each hospital retroactively to July 1.

“Hospital,” as used in this section, shall mean the actual facilities and buildings in existence in Rhode Island, licensed pursuant to §

23-17-1

et seq. on June 30, 2010, and thereafter any premises included on that license, regardless of changes in licensure status pursuant to chapter 17.14 of title 23 (hospital conversions) and § 23-17-6(b) (change in effective control), that provides short-term, acute inpatient and/or outpatient care to persons who require definitive diagnosis and treatment for injury, illness, disabilities, or pregnancy. Notwithstanding the preceding language, the Medicaid managed care payment rates for a court-approved purchaser that acquires a hospital through receivership, special mastership or other similar state insolvency proceedings (which court-approved purchaser is issued a hospital license after January 1, 2013), shall be based upon the new rates between the court-approved purchaser and the health plan, and such rates shall be effective as of the date that the court-approved purchaser and the health plan execute the initial agreement containing the new rates. The rate-setting methodology for inpatient-hospital payments and outpatient-hospital payments set forth in subsections (b)(1)(ii)(C) and (b)(2), respectively, shall thereafter apply to increases for each annual twelve-month (12) period as of July 1 following the completion of the first full year of the court-approved purchaser’s initial Medicaid managed care contract.

It is intended that payment utilizing the DRG method shall reward hospitals for providing the most efficient care, and provide the executive office the opportunity to conduct value-based purchasing of inpatient care.

The secretary of the executive office is hereby authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations consistent with this chapter, and to establish fiscal procedures he or she deems necessary, for the proper implementation and administration of this chapter in order to provide payment to hospitals using the DRG-payment methodology. Furthermore, amendment of the Rhode Island state plan for Medicaid, pursuant to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., is hereby authorized to provide for payment to hospitals for services provided to eligible recipients in accordance with this chapter.

The executive office shall comply with all public notice requirements necessary to implement these rate changes.

As a condition of participation in the DRG methodology for payment of hospital services, every hospital shall submit year-end settlement reports to the executive office within one year from the close of a hospital’s fiscal year. Should a participating hospital fail to timely submit a year-end settlement report as required by this section, the executive office shall withhold financial-cycle payments due by any state agency with respect to this hospital by not more than ten percent (10%) until the report is submitted. For hospital fiscal year 2010 and all subsequent fiscal years, hospitals will not be required to submit year-end settlement reports on payments for outpatient services. For hospital fiscal year 2011 and all subsequent fiscal years, hospitals will not be required to submit year-end settlement reports on claims for hospital inpatient services. Further, for hospital fiscal year 2010, hospital inpatient claims subject to settlement shall include only those claims received between October 1, 2009, and June 30, 2010.

The provisions of this section shall be effective upon implementation of the new payment methodology set forth in this section and §

40-8-13.3

, which shall in any event be no later than March 30, 2010, at which time the provisions of §§

40-8-13.2

,

27-19-14

,

27-19-15

, and

27-19-16

shall be repealed in their entirety.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 23, § 7; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 20, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 120, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 19, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 18, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 10; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 7, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 9, § 4; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 5; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 12, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

40-8-13.5.
Hospital Incentive Program (HIP).

The secretary of the executive office of health and human services is authorized to seek the federal authorities required to implement a hospital incentive program (HIP). The HIP shall provide the participating licensed hospitals the ability to obtain certain payments for achieving performance goals established by the secretary. HIP payments shall commence no earlier than July 1, 2016.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 10.

40-8-14.
Appropriations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate a sum as it may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sum or sums or so much thereof as may be required from time to time, upon the receipt by him or her of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 266, § 2; G.L., § 40-10.1-14; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-8-15.
Lien on deceased recipient’s estate for assistance.

Upon the death of a recipient of Medicaid under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq. and referred to hereinafter as the “Act”), the total sum for Medicaid benefits so paid on behalf of a beneficiary who was fifty-five (55) years of age or older at the time of receipt shall be and constitute a lien upon the estate, as defined in subsection (a)(2), of the beneficiary in favor of the executive office of health and human services (“executive office”). The lien shall not be effective and shall not attach as against the estate of a beneficiary who is survived by a spouse, or a child who is under the age of twenty-one (21), or a child who is blind or permanently and totally disabled as defined in Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq. The lien shall attach against property of a beneficiary, which is included or includable in the decedent’s probate estate, regardless of whether or not a probate proceeding has been commenced in the probate court by the executive office or by any other party. Provided, however, that such lien shall only attach and shall only be effective against the beneficiary’s real property included or includable in the beneficiary’s probate estate if such lien is recorded in the land evidence records and is in accordance with subsection (e). Decedents who have received Medicaid benefits are subject to the assignment and subrogation provisions of §§

40-6-9

and

40-6-10

.

For purposes of this section, the term “estate” with respect to a deceased individual shall include all real and personal property and other assets included or includable within the individual’s probate estate.

The executive office is authorized to promulgate regulations to implement the terms, intent, and purpose of this section and to require the legal representative(s) and/or the heirs-at-law of the decedent to provide reasonable written notice to the executive office of the death of a beneficiary of Medicaid benefits who was fifty-five (55) years of age or older at the date of death, and to provide a statement identifying the decedent’s property and the names and addresses of all persons entitled to take any share or interest of the estate as legatees or distributees thereof.

The amount of reimbursement for Medicaid benefits imposed under this section shall also become a debt to the state from the person or entity liable for the payment thereof.

Upon payment of the amount of reimbursement for Medicaid benefits imposed by this section, the secretary of the executive office, or his or her designee, shall issue a written discharge of lien.

Provided, however, that no lien created under this section shall attach nor become effective upon any real property unless and until a statement of claim is recorded naming the debtor/owner of record of the property as of the date and time of recording of the statement of claim, and describing the real property by a description containing all of the following: (1) Tax assessor’s plat and lot; and (2) Street address. The statement of claim shall be recorded in the records of land evidence in the town or city where the real property is situated. Notice of the lien shall be sent to the duly appointed executor or administrator, the decedent’s legal representative, if known, or to the decedent’s next of kin or heirs at law as stated in the decedent’s last application for Medicaid benefits.

The executive office shall establish procedures, in accordance with the standards specified by the Secretary, United States Department of Health and Human Services, under which the executive office shall waive, in whole or in part, the lien and reimbursement established by this section if the lien and reimbursement would cause an undue hardship, as determined by the executive office, on the basis of the criteria established by the secretary in accordance with 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(b)(3).

Upon the filing of a petition for admission to probate of a decedent’s will or for administration of a decedent’s estate, when the decedent was fifty-five (55) years or older at the time of death, a copy of the petition and a copy of the death certificate shall be sent to the executive office. Within thirty (30) days of a request by the executive office, an executor or administrator shall complete and send to the executive office a form prescribed by that office and shall provide such additional information as the office may require. In the event a petitioner fails to send a copy of the petition and a copy of the death certificate to the executive office and a decedent has received Medicaid benefits for which the executive office is authorized to recover, no distribution and/or payments, including administration fees, shall be disbursed. Any person and/or entity that receives a distribution of assets from the decedent’s estate shall be liable to the executive office to the extent of such distribution.

Compliance with the provisions of this section shall be consistent with the requirements set forth in §

33-11-5

and the requirements of the affidavit of notice set forth in §

33-11-5

.2. Nothing in these sections shall limit the executive office from recovery, to the extent of the distribution, in accordance with all state and federal laws.

To ensure the financial integrity of the Medicaid eligibility determination, benefit renewal, and estate recovery processes in this and related sections, the secretary of health and human services is authorized and directed to, by no later than August 1, 2018: (1) Implement an automated asset verification system, as mandated by § 1940 of the Act, that uses electronic data sources to verify the ownership and value of countable resources held in financial institutions and any real property for applicants and beneficiaries subject to resource and asset tests pursuant to the Act in § 1902(e)(14)(D); (2) Apply the provisions required under §§ 1902(a)(18) and 1917(c) of the Act pertaining to the disposition of assets for less than fair market value by applicants and beneficiaries for Medicaid long-term services and supports and their spouses, without regard to whether they are subject to or exempted from resources and asset tests as mandated by federal guidance; and (3) Pursue any state plan or waiver amendments from the United States Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and promulgate such rules, regulations, and procedures he or she deems necessary to carry out the requirements set forth herein and ensure the state plan and Medicaid policy conform and comply with applicable provisions of Title XIX.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 28, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 99, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 11, § 5; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 13, § 1.

40-8-16.
Notification of long-term care alternative.

The department of human services, before authorizing care in a nursing home or intermediate-care facility for a person who is eligible to receive benefits pursuant to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., and who is being discharged from a hospital to a nursing home, shall notify the person, in writing, of the provisions of the long-term-care alternative, a home- and a community-based program.

If a person, eligible to receive benefits pursuant to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, requires services in a nursing home and desires to remain in his or her own home or the home of a responsible relative or other adult, the person or his or her representative shall so inform the department.

The department shall not make payments pursuant to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act for benefits until written notification documenting the person’s choice as to a nursing home or home- and community-based services has been filed with the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 500, § 1.

40-8-17.
Waiver request.

Formation. The executive office of health and human services is directed and authorized to apply for and obtain any necessary waiver(s), waiver amendment(s), and/or state plan amendments from the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, including, but not limited to, an extension of the section 1115(a) demonstration waiver amended, as appropriate, and renamed to reflect the state’s effort to coordinate all publicly financed health care. The secretary of the office shall ensure that the state’s health and human services departments and the people and communities they serve in the Medicaid program shall have the opportunity to contribute to and collaborate in the formulation of any request for a new waiver, waiver extension, and/or state plan amendment(s). Any actions shall: (1) Continue efforts to rebalance the system of long-term services and supports by assisting people in obtaining care in the most appropriate and least restrictive setting; (2) Pursue further utilization of care-management models that promote preventive care, offer a health home, and provide an integrated system of services; (3) Use smart payments and purchasing to finance and support Medicaid initiatives that fill gaps in the integrated system of care; and (4) Recognize and ensure access to non-medical services and supports, such as peer navigation and employment and housing stabilization services, that are essential for optimizing a person’s health, wellness, and safety and that reduce or delay the need for long-term services and supports.

Effective July 1, 2009, any provision presently in effect in the Rhode Island general laws where the executive office of health and human services is authorized to apply for and obtain any necessary waiver(s), waiver amendment(s), and/or state plan amendment(s) for the purpose of providing medical assistance to recipients, shall authorize the executive office of health and human services to proceed with appropriate category changes in accordance with the special terms and conditions of the Rhode Island Global Consumer Choice Compact section 1115(a) Demonstration Waiver or any extension thereof, as amended and/or renamed under the authority provided in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 500, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 26; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 17, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 23, § 11; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 19, § 1.

40-8-18.
Local education agencies as EPSDT providers.

It is the intent of this section to provide reimbursement for early and periodic screening, diagnosis and treatment (EPSDT) services through local education agencies for children who are eligible for medical assistance. A local education agency’s participation as an EPSDT provider is voluntary. Further, it is the intent that collaboration among the department of human services (DHS), the department of elementary and secondary education, and local education agencies (LEAs) will result in state and local funds being used to maximize federal funding for such EPSDT services.

The services available to eligible children under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., for early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment (EPSDT) may be provided by local education agencies.

Voluntary participation as an EPSDT provider shall require the local education agency to provide the state match to obtain federal financial participation for EPSDT services and associated administrative costs by certifying to the department of human services that sufficient qualifying local funds (local certified match) have been expended for the services and administrative costs; provided, however, that a local education agency shall not be required to provide local certified match for those EPSDT services for which the department of human services, or another state agency, agrees to provide the state match to obtain federal financial participation for EPSDT services.

The local certified match shall be established in the local education agency pursuant to federal Title XIX provisions. Failure of the local education agency to provide the local match shall result in the penalties described in subsection (f).

The department of human services shall pay the local education agency from the federal matching funds for EPSDT services pursuant to fee schedules established by rules and regulations of the department of human services, and for associated administrative costs pursuant to administrative cost reimbursement methodologies to be approved by the federal government, upon certification of the local match by the local education agency in accordance with federal Title XIX provisions. Payments made to the local education agency pursuant to this section shall be used solely for educational purposes and shall not be made available to local communities for purposes other than education. The local fiscal effort to support education referred to in subsection (d) shall not be reduced in response to the availability of these federal financial participation funds to the local education agency. These federal financial participation funds must supplement, not supplant, local maintained fiscal effort to support education.

For the purposes of this subsection, the term “local education agency” shall include any city, town, state, or regional school district or the school for the deaf or the William M. Davies, Jr. career and technical high school, the Metropolitan Career and Technical Center, any public charter school established pursuant to chapter 77 of title 16, any educational collaborative established pursuant to chapter 3.1 of title 16, or the department of children, youth and families (DCYF).

Each community shall maintain local fiscal effort for education. For the purpose of this subsection, to “maintain local fiscal effort” means each community shall contribute local funds to its school committee in an amount not less than its local contribution for schools in the previous fiscal year.

Further, state support for education shall not be reduced from the prior fiscal year in response to local community participation in the EPSDT program.

The department of human services and the department of elementary and secondary education shall effect the interagency transfers necessary to comply with the provisions of this section. The department of elementary and secondary education and the department of human services are authorized to promulgate any and all regulations necessary to implement this section. All local school agencies becoming EPSDT providers shall be required to comply with all provisions of Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., relative to responsibilities of a Medicaid provider.

Failure of the local education agency to establish a local certified match under this law sufficient to support its claims for reimbursement of EPSDT services and associated administrative costs will result in the withholding of state funds due that community in accordance with §

16-7-31

in an amount equal to the federal financial participation funds denied by the federal government as a result thereof. The withheld funds will be transferred to the department of human services.

The department of human services, with the aid of the department of education, shall determine which healthcare-related services are eligible for federal Medicaid reimbursement for health-related services provided by local education agencies to children eligible for early periodic screening, diagnosis and treatment. The department of human services, with the assistance of the department of administration, shall also develop the following resources in furtherance of the goal of recouping the maximum amount of administrative costs associated with the services:

A time-study training manual that outlines how to complete a time study by school personnel to enhance recovery of administrative costs; and

A claiming manual that outlines the financial information and claim submission requirements that are needed to complete the claim.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 289, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 241, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 13, § 1.